Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF816.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; PHOENIX CORRESPONDENCE COMMISSION.new text end new text begin $10,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of administration for payment to the Phoenix Correspondence Commission to support the work of the commission to further the role of federalism with our federal constitutional structure. new text end